Illinois, session 104th, HB595.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Uniform Electronic Legal Material Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 180/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Uniform Electronic Legal Material Act.9(Source: P.A. 98-1097, eff. 1-1-15.)